Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,169
Department; conduct inspections; types; rules and regulations; manner conducted.

(1) The department shall conduct inspections as required by the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act. Two types of inspections shall be conducted which shall be known as operation inspections and accreditation inspections. An operation inspection shall be conducted to ascertain that an establishment or a facility is operating in full compliance with all laws, rules, and regulations. An accreditation inspection shall be conducted to accomplish the purposes of an operation inspection and to ascertain that a school of cosmetology, a nail technology school, a school of esthetics, or an apprentice salon is maintaining academic standards and requirements of a quality consistent with the purpose of the act. All accreditation inspections shall be announced at least two weeks prior to the actual inspection.

(2) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the standards and criteria to be used in the conduct of inspections, the rating system to be used, and the level of achievement necessary to receive a passing grade.

(3) Operation inspections shall be unannounced and shall be conducted during the normal working hours of the establishment or facility.

(4) At the conclusion of the inspection, the owner or manager of the establishment or facility shall receive a copy of the rating form, which form shall be promptly displayed, and a statement of any deficiencies noted.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 130;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 52;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 85;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 47;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 29;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 38;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,169;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 431.